Hawaii statutes.
§88-74 Allowance on service
retirement. (a) Upon retirement from service, a member shall receive a
maximum retirement allowance as provided in this section.

(b) If a member, who became a member before
July 1, 2012, has attained age fifty-five, the member's maximum retirement
allowance shall be two per cent of the member's average final compensation
multiplied by the total number of years of the member's credited service as a
class A and class B member, excluding any credited service as a judge, elective
officer, or legislative officer, plus a retirement allowance of one and
one-fourth per cent of the member's average final compensation multiplied by
the total number of years of prior credited service as a class C member, plus a
retirement allowance of two per cent of the member's average final compensation
multiplied by the total number of years of prior credited service as a class H
member; provided that:

(1) After June 30, 1968, if the member has at least
ten years of credited service of which the last five or more years prior to
retirement is credited service as a firefighter, police officer, or an
investigator of the department of the prosecuting attorney;

(2) After June 30, 1977, if the member has at least
ten years of credited service of which the last five or more years prior to
retirement is credited service as a corrections officer;

(3) After June 16, 1981, if the member has at least
ten years of credited service of which the last five or more years prior to
retirement is credited service as an investigator of the department of the
attorney general;

(4) After June 30, 1989, if the member has at least
ten years of credited service of which the last five or more years prior to
retirement is credited service as a narcotics enforcement investigator;

(5) After December 31, 1993, if the member has at
least ten years of credited service of which the last five or more years prior
to retirement is credited service as a water safety officer;

(6) After June 30, 1994, if the member has at least
ten years of credited service, of which the last five or more years prior to
retirement are credited service as a public safety investigations staff
investigator;

(7) After June 30, 2002, if the member:

(A) Has at least ten years of credited
service as a firefighter;

(B) Is deemed permanently medically
disqualified due to a service related disability to be a firefighter by the
employer's physician; and

(C) Continues employment in a class A or B
position other than a firefighter; and

(8) After June 30, 2004, if the member:

(A) Has at least ten years of credited
service as a police officer;

(B) Is deemed permanently medically
disqualified due to a service related disability to be a police officer by the
employer's physician; and

(C) Continues employment in a class A or B
position other than a police officer;

then for each year of service as a firefighter,
police officer, corrections officer, investigator of the department of the
prosecuting attorney, investigator of the department of the attorney general,
narcotics enforcement investigator, water safety officer, or public safety
investigations staff investigator, the retirement allowance shall be two and
one-half per cent of the member's average final compensation. The maximum
retirement allowance for those members shall not exceed eighty per cent of the
member's average final compensation. If the member has not attained age
fifty-five, the member's retirement allowance shall be computed as though the
member had attained age fifty-five, reduced for age as provided in subsection
(e).

(c) If a member, who became a member prior to
July 1, 2012, has credited service as a judge, the member's retirement
allowance shall be computed on the following basis:

(1) For a member who has credited service as a judge
before July 1, 1999, irrespective of age, for each year of credited service as
a judge, three and one-half per cent of the member's average final compensation
in addition to an annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's
accumulated contributions allocable to the period of service;

(2) For a member who first earned credited service as
a judge after June 30, 1999, but before July 1, 2012, for each year of credited
service as a judge, three and one-half per cent of the member's average final
compensation in addition to an annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the
member's accumulated contributions allocable to the period of service. If the
member has not attained age fifty-five, the member's retirement allowance shall
be computed as though the member had attained age fifty-five, reduced for age
as provided in subsection (e);

(3) For a member who first earned credited service as
a judge after June 30, 2012, for each year of credited service as a judge,
three per cent of the member's average final compensation in addition to an
annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions allocable to the period of service. If the member has not
attained age sixty, the member's retirement allowance shall be computed as though
the member had attained age sixty, reduced for age as provided in
subsection (i);

(4) For a judge with other credited service, as
provided in subsection (b). If the member has not attained age fifty-five, the
member's retirement allowance shall be computed as though the member had
attained age fifty-five, reduced for age as provided in subsection (e); or

(5) For a judge with credited service as an elective
officer or as a legislative officer, as provided in subsection (d).

No allowance shall exceed seventy-five per cent of
the member's average final compensation. If the allowance exceeds this limit,
it shall be adjusted by reducing the annuity included in paragraphs (1), (2),
and (3) and the portion of the accumulated contributions specified in paragraphs
(1), (2), and (3) in excess of the requirements of the reduced annuity shall be
returned to the member upon the member's retirement or paid to the member's
designated beneficiary upon the member's death while in service or while on
authorized leave without pay. The allowance for judges under this subsection,
together with the retirement allowance provided by the federal government for
similar service, shall in no case exceed seventy-five per cent of the member's
average final compensation.

(d) If a member, who became a member before
July 1, 2012, has credited service as an elective officer or as a legislative
officer, the member's retirement allowance shall be derived by adding the
allowances computed separately under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and
(6) as follows:

(1) For a member who has credited service as an
elective officer before July 1, 2012, irrespective of age, for each year of
credited service as an elective officer, three and one-half per cent of the
member's average final compensation as computed under section 88-81(e)(1), in
addition to an annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's
accumulated contributions allocable to the period of service;

(2) For a member, who first earned credited service
as an elective officer after June 30, 2012, irrespective of age, for each year
of credited service as an elective officer, three per cent of the member's
average final compensation as computed under section 88-81(e)(1), in addition
to an annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions allocable to the period of service;

(3) For a member who has credited service as a
legislative officer before July 1, 2012, irrespective of age, for each year of
credited service as a legislative officer, three and one-half per cent of the
member's average final compensation as computed under section 88-81(e)(2), in
addition to an annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's
accumulated contributions allocable to the period of service;

(4) For a member who first earned credited service as
a legislative officer after June 30, 2012, irrespective of age, for each year
of credited service as a legislative officer, three per cent of the member's
average final compensation as computed under section 88-81(e)(2), in addition
to an annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions allocable to the period of service;

(5) If the member has credited service as a judge,
the member's retirement allowance shall be computed on the following basis:

(A) For a member who has credited service as
a judge before July 1, 1999, irrespective of age, for each year of credited
service as a judge, three and one-half per cent of the member's average final
compensation as computed under section 88-81(e)(3), in addition to an annuity
that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated contributions
allocable to the period of service;

(B) For a member who first earned credited
service as a judge after June 30, 1999, but before July 1, 2012, and has
attained the age of fifty-five, for each year of credited service as a judge,
three and one-half per cent of the member's average final compensation as
computed under section 88-81(e)(3), in addition to an annuity that is the
actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated contributions allocable to the
period of service. If the member has not attained age fifty-five, the member's
retirement allowance shall be computed as though the member had attained age
fifty-five, reduced for age as provided in subsection (e); and

(C) For a member who first earned credited
service as a judge after June 30, 2012, and has attained the age of sixty, for
each year of credited service as a judge, three per cent of the member's
average final compensation as computed under section 88-81(e)(3), in addition
to an annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions allocable to the period of service. If the member has not
attained age sixty, the member's retirement allowance shall be computed as
though the member had attained age sixty, reduced for age as provided in
subsection (i); and

(6) For each year of credited service not included in
paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5), the average final compensation as
computed under section 88-81(e)(4) shall be multiplied by two per cent for
credited service earned as a class A or class H member, two and one-half per
cent for credited service earned as a class B member, and one and one-quarter
per cent for credited service earned as a class C member. If the member has
not attained age fifty-five, the member's retirement allowance shall be
computed as though the member had attained age fifty-five, reduced for age as
provided in subsection (e).

The total retirement allowance shall not exceed seventy-five
per cent of the member's highest average final compensation calculated under
section 88-81(e)(1), (2), (3), or (4). If the allowance exceeds this limit, it
shall be adjusted by reducing any annuity accrued under paragraphs (1), (2), (3),
(4), and (5) and the portion of the accumulated contributions specified in
these paragraphs in excess of the requirements of the reduced annuity shall be
returned to the member upon the member's retirement or paid to the member's
designated beneficiary upon the member's death while in service or while on
authorized leave without pay. If a member has service credit as an elective
officer or as a legislative officer in addition to service credit as a judge,
then the retirement benefit calculation contained in this subsection shall
supersede the formula contained in subsection (c).

(e) Except as provided in subsections (b),
(c), and (d), if a member, who became a member before July 1, 2012, has not
attained age fifty-five at the date of retirement, the member's retirement
allowance shall be reduced, for each month the member's age at the date of
retirement is below age fifty-five, as follows:

(1) 0.4166 per cent for each month below age
fifty-five and above age forty-nine and eleven months; plus

(2) 0.3333 per cent for each month below age fifty
and above age forty-four and eleven months; plus

(3) 0.2500 per cent for each month below age
forty-five and above age thirty-nine and eleven months; plus

(4) 0.1666 per cent for each month below age forty;

provided that no reduction shall be made if the
member has at least twenty-five years of credited service as a firefighter,
police officer, corrections officer, investigator of the department of the
prosecuting attorney, investigator of the department of the attorney general,
narcotics enforcement investigator, public safety investigations staff
investigator, sewer worker, or water safety officer, of which the last five or
more years prior to retirement is credited service in these capacities.

(f) If a member, who becomes a member after
June 30, 2012, has attained age sixty, the member's maximum retirement
allowance shall be one and three-fourths per cent of the member's average final
compensation multiplied by the total number of years of the member's credited
service as a class A and class B member, excluding any credited service as a
judge, elective officer, or legislative officer, plus a retirement allowance of
one and one-fourth per cent of the member's average final compensation
multiplied by the total number of years of prior credited service as a class C
member, plus a retirement allowance of one and three-fourths per cent of the
member's average final compensation multiplied by the total number of years of
prior credited service as a class H member; provided that:

(1) If the member has at least ten years of credited
service of which the last five or more years prior to retirement is credited
service as a firefighter, police officer, or an investigator of the department
of the prosecuting attorney;

(2) If the member has at least ten years of credited
service of which the last five or more years prior to retirement is credited
service as a corrections officer;

(3) If the member has at least ten years of credited
service of which the last five or more years prior to retirement is credited
service as an investigator of the department of the attorney general;

(4) If the member has at least ten years of credited
service of which the last five or more years prior to retirement is credited
service as a narcotics enforcement investigator;

(5) If the member has at least ten years of credited
service, of which the last five or more years prior to retirement is credited
service as a public safety investigations staff investigator;

(6) If the member:

(A) Has at least ten years of credited
service as a firefighter;

(B) Is deemed permanently medically
disqualified due to a service related disability to be a firefighter by the
employer's physician; and

(C) Continues employment in a class A or
class B position other than a firefighter; and

(7) If the member:

(A) Has at least ten years of credited
service as a police officer;

(B) Is deemed permanently medically
disqualified due to a service related disability to be a police officer by the
employer's physician; and

(C) Continues employment in a class A or
class B position other than a police officer,

then for each year of service as a firefighter,
police officer, corrections officer, investigator of the department of the
prosecuting attorney, investigator of the department of the attorney general,
narcotics enforcement investigator, or public safety investigations staff
investigator, the retirement allowance shall be two and one-fourth per cent of
the member's average final compensation. The maximum retirement allowance for
those members shall not exceed eighty per cent of the member's average final
compensation. If the member has not attained age sixty, the member's
retirement allowance shall be computed as though the member had attained age
sixty, reduced for age as provided in subsection (i).

(g) If a member, who becomes a member after
June 30, 2012, has credited service as a judge, the member's retirement
allowance shall be computed on the following basis:

(1) For each year of credited service as a judge,
three per cent of the member's average final compensation in addition to an
annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions allocable to the period of service. If the member has not
attained age sixty, the member's retirement allowance shall be computed as
though the member had attained age sixty, reduced for age as provided in
subsection (i);

(2) For a judge with other credited service, as
provided in subsection (f). If the member has not attained age sixty, the
member's retirement allowance shall be computed as though the member had
attained age sixty, reduced for age as provided in subsection (i); and

(3) For a judge with credited service as an elective
officer or as a legislative officer, as provided in subsection (h).

No allowance shall exceed seventy-five per cent of
the member's average final compensation. If the allowance exceeds this limit,
it shall be adjusted by reducing the annuity included in paragraph (1) and the
portion of the accumulated contributions specified in paragraph (1) in excess
of the requirements of the reduced annuity shall be returned to the member upon
the member's retirement or paid to the member's designated beneficiary upon the
member's death while in service or while on authorized leave without pay. The
allowance for judges under this subsection, together with the retirement
allowance provided by the federal government for similar service, shall in no
case exceed seventy-five per cent of the member's average final compensation.

(h) If a member, who becomes a member after
June 30, 2012, has credited service as an elective officer or as a legislative
officer, the member's retirement allowance shall be derived by adding the
allowances computed separately under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) as
follows:

(1) Irrespective of age, for each year of credited
service as an elective officer, three per cent of the member's average final
compensation as computed under section 88-81(f)(1), in addition to an annuity
that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated contributions
allocable to the period of service;

(2) Irrespective of age, for each year of credited
service as a legislative officer, three per cent of the member's average final
compensation as computed under section 88-81(f)(2), in addition to an annuity
that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated contributions
allocable to the period of service;

(3) For each year of credited service as a judge,
three per cent of the member's average final compensation as computed under
section 88‑81(f)(3), in addition to an annuity that is the actuarial
equivalent of the member's accumulated contributions allocable to the period of
service. If the member has not attained age sixty, the member's retirement
allowance shall be computed as though the member had attained age sixty,
reduced for age as provided in subsection (i); and

(4) For each year of credited service not included in
paragraph (1), (2), or (3), the average final compensation as computed under
section 88-81(f)(4) shall be multiplied by one and three-fourth per cent for
credited service earned as a class A or class H member, two and one-fourth per
cent for credited service earned as a class B member, and one and one‑fourth
per cent for credited service earned as a class C member. If the member has
not attained age sixty, the member's retirement allowance shall be computed as
though the member had attained age sixty, reduced for age as provided in
subsection (i).

The total retirement allowance shall not exceed
seventy-five per cent of the member's highest average final compensation
calculated under section 88-81(f)(1), (2), (3), or (4). If the allowance
exceeds this limit, it shall be adjusted by reducing any annuity accrued under
paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) and the portion of the accumulated contributions
specified in these paragraphs in excess of the requirements of the reduced
annuity shall be returned to the member upon the member's retirement or paid to
the member's designated beneficiary upon the member's death while in service or
while on authorized leave without pay. If a member has service credit as an
elective officer or as a legislative officer in addition to service credit as a
judge, then the retirement benefit calculation contained in this subsection shall
supersede the formula contained in subsection (g).

(i) Except as provided in subsections (f),
(g), and (h), if a member, who becomes a member after June 30, 2012, has not
attained age sixty at the date of retirement, the member's retirement allowance
shall be reduced, for each month the member's age at the date of retirement is
below age sixty, as follows:

(1) 0.4166 per cent for each month below age sixty
and above age fifty-four and eleven months; plus

(2) 0.3333 per cent for each month below age fifty-five
and above age forty-nine and eleven months; plus

(3) 0.2500 per cent for each month below age fifty
and above age forty-four and eleven months; plus

(4) 0.1666 per cent for each month below age
forty-five;

provided that no reduction shall be made if the
member has attained the age of fifty-five and has at least twenty-five years of
credited service as a firefighter, police officer, corrections officer,
investigator of the department of the prosecuting attorney, investigator of the
department of the attorney general, narcotics enforcement investigator, public
safety investigations staff investigator, sewer worker, water safety officer,
or emergency medical technician, of which the last five or more years prior to
retirement is credited service in these capacities. [L 1925, c 55, §6(2); RL
1935, pt of §7925; RL 1945, §708, subs 2; am L 1945, c 73, §1(e); am L 1947, c
85, §1(d); RL 1955, §6-42; am L 1957, c 143, §3 and c 231, §1(c); am L 1961, c
175, §2 and c 181, §4; am L 1962, c 20, §3; am L 1963, c 127, §4; am L 1964, c
62, §5; am L 1965, c 222, §5; am L 1967, c 130, §§2, 4; HRS §88-64; am L 1969,
c 110, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 179, §28; am L 1975, c 178, §1 and c 199, §2; am
L 1977, c 191, §2; am L 1978, c 230, §1; am L 1982, c 165, §2(14); gen ch 1985;
am L 1987, c 117, §2; am L 1989, c 343, §4; am L 1991, c 96, §1(3); am L 1992,
c 160, §2; am L 1993, c 357, §1(4); am L 1994, c 196, §5 and c 276, §4; am L
1997, c 211, §1 and c 374, §2; am L 1999, c 65, §3; am L 2002, c 205, §1; am L
2003, c 118, §4; am L 2004, c 177, §1 and c 179, §10; am L 2005, c 58, §7; am L
2007, c 215, §7; am L 2011, c 163, §5; am L 2012, c 153, §1]

Attorney General Opinions

Upon retirement, a member with service as a judge or an
elected officer is entitled to have each year of such service computed at the
3-1/2% rate, regardless of the length of such service. Att. Gen. Op. 72-19.

Enhanced benefits of various law enforcement officers and
firefighters, discussed. Att. Gen. Op. 90-2.

In general, the calculation of retirement benefits of
elective officers who were elective officers on July 1, 1997, pursuant to Act
374, Session Laws of Hawaii 1997, should be made thus: the law as it existed
before the effective date of Act 374 (July 1, 1997) is applied to service
accrued before the effective date of the Act (i.e., elective officers can apply
a high average final compensation to years of possibly multiple types of
services, including elective service) and the amount derived from that
calculation is added to the amount arrived at by applying the Act to service
accrued after the effective date of the Act (which is segregated by service
category). This results in using different average final compensations for
pre- and post-Act service. Att. Gen. Op. 2000-1.

Case Notes

Mentioned: 75 H. 42, 856 P.2d 1227.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next